Utah statutes.
70A-2a-523.   Lessor's remedies.
(1)  If a lessee wrongfully rejects or revokes acceptance of goods or fails to
make a payment when due or repudiates with respect to a part or the whole,
then, with respect to any goods involved, and with respect to all of the goods
if under an installment lease contract the value of the whole lease contract
is substantially impaired as provided in Section 70A-2a-510, the lessee is in
default under the lease contract and the lessor may:
(a)  cancel the lease contract as provided in Subsection 70A-2a-505 (1);
(b)  proceed respecting goods not identified to the lease contract as provided
in Section 70A-2a-524;
(c)  withhold delivery of the goods and take possession of goods previously
delivered as provided in Section 70A-2a-525;
(d)  stop delivery of the goods by any bailee as provided in Section 70A-
2a-526;
(e)  dispose of the goods and recover damages as provided in Section 70A-
2a-527, or retain the goods and recover damages as provided in Section 70A-
2a-528, or in a proper case recover rent as provided in Section 70A-2a-529; or
(f)  exercise any other rights or pursue any other remedies provided in the
lease contract.
(2)  If a lessor does not fully exercise a right or obtain a remedy to which
the lessor is entitled under Subsection (1), the lessor may recover the loss
resulting in the ordinary course of events from the lessee's default as
determined in a reasonable manner, together with incidental damages, less
expenses saved in consequence of the lessee's default.
(3)  If a lessee is otherwise in default under a lease contract, the lessor
may exercise the rights and pursue the remedies provided in the lease
contract, which may include a right to cancel the lease.  In addition, unless
otherwise provided in the lease contract:
(a)  if the default substantially impairs the value of the lease contract to
the lessor, the lessor may exercise the rights and pursue the remedies
provided in Subsections (1) or (2); or
(b)  if the default does not substantially impair the value of the lease
contract to the lessor, the lessor may recover as provided in Subsection (2).
